Mississippi, session 2026, HB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Statewide Utility Tax Reform Act". (2)  The purpose of this act is to redefine the taxation structure for public utilities, including nuclear power plants, to ensure fair and equitable distribution of tax revenues, with particular emphasis on compensating counties hosting high-risk facilities. SECTION 2. All nuclear fuel, nuclear fuel by-products and  related materials are subject to ad valorem taxation at the same rate as other taxable property in Mississippi, with the revenue allocated as specified in this act. SECTION 3. Counties hosting high-risk facilities, including nuclear power plants, shall receive the majority share of tax revenues derived from those facilities.  The tiered distribution system for the allocation of tax revenues is as follows: (a)  Tier 1 Counties (High-Risk Hosts):  Counties hosting a nuclear power plant or other high-risk utility shall receive sixty-five percent (65%) of the total ad valorem taxes collected from the facility. (b)  Tier 2 Counties (Adjacent Counties):  Counties adjacent to the host county shall receive ten percent (10%) of the total ad valorem taxes collected to account for spillover risks and shared infrastructure impact, to be allocated among those counties as determined by the department with consideration given to each county's risks and infrastructure impact. (c)  State General Fund:  The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) shall be allocated to the State of Mississippi for statewide utility oversight and infrastructure development. SECTION 4. (1)  Utility companies operating high-risk facilities, including Entergy Corporation, shall make annual Payments in Lieu of Taxes (PILOT) directly to the host counties. (2)  The PILOT amount shall be calculated as follows: (a)  Base Amount:  Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) annually per high-risk facility; and (b)  Performance-Based Adjustment:  An additional payment of One Cent ($0.01) per kilowatt-hour of electricity generated by the facility. (3)  PILOT funds must be used exclusively for: (a)  Infrastructure improvements; (b)  Emergency preparedness and public safety; and (c)  Health and environmental monitoring. SECTION 5. Revenues received under this act must be allocated by host counties as follows: (a)  Forty percent (40%) for public infrastructure, including roads, bridges and utilities. (b)  Thirty percent (30%) for education, including public schools and scholarships for county residents. (c)  Twenty percent (20%) for healthcare and emergency preparedness. (d)  Ten percent (10%) for economic development initiatives. SECTION 6. (1)  The Department of Revenue shall oversee the implementation of and compliance with this act. (2)  Each utility company shall submit to the department an annual report detailing tax payments, PILOT contributions and electricity production figures. (3)  Each host county shall submit an annual expenditure report to the department detailing the use of revenues received under this act. (4)  Utilizing information contained in the reports required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Department of Revenue shall publish an annual report summarizing the tax revenues, distributions and expenditures under this act. SECTION 7.  Section 27-31-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-31-1.  The following shall be exempt from taxation: (a)  All cemeteries used exclusively for burial purposes. (b)  All property, real or personal, belonging to the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions, except property of a municipality not being used for a proper municipal purpose and located outside the county or counties in which such municipality is located.  A proper municipal purpose within the meaning of this section shall be any authorized governmental or corporate function of a municipality. (c)  All property, real or personal, owned by units of the Mississippi National Guard, or title to which is vested in trustees for the benefit of any unit of the Mississippi National Guard; provided such property is used exclusively for such unit, or for public purposes, and not for profit. (d)  All property, real or personal, belonging to any religious society, or ecclesiastical body, or any congregation thereof, or to any charitable society, or to any historical or patriotic association or society, or to any garden or pilgrimage club or association and used exclusively for such society or association and not for profit; not exceeding, however, the amount of land which such association or society may own as provided in Section 79-11-33.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any foundation organized as a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that receives, invests and administers private support for a state-supported institution of higher learning, a public community college or junior college located in the State of Mississippi or a nonprofit private university or college located in the State of Mississippi, as the case may be. For the sole purpose of applying the preceding sentence, all property, real or personal, belonging to an entity that is wholly owned by and controlled by such a foundation shall be treated as belonging to the foundation, provided such property is not leased or otherwise used to generate revenue that is not used exclusively to benefit an institution described above.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any rural waterworks system or rural sewage disposal system incorporated under the provisions of Section 79-11-1.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any college or institution for the education of youths, used directly and exclusively for such purposes, provided that no such college or institution for the education of youths shall have exempt from taxation more than six hundred forty (640) acres of land; provided, however, this exemption shall not apply to commercial schools and colleges or trade institutions or schools where the profits of same inure to individuals, associations or corporations.  All property, real or personal, belonging to an individual, institution or corporation and used for the operation of a grammar school, junior high school, high school or military school.  All property, real or personal, owned and occupied by a fraternal and benevolent organization, when used by such organization, and from which no rentals or other profits accrue to the organization, but any part rented or from which revenue is received shall be taxed. (e)  All property, real or personal, held and occupied by trustees of public schools, and school lands of the respective townships for the use of public schools, and all property kept in storage for the convenience and benefit of the State of Mississippi in warehouses owned or leased by the State of Mississippi, wherein said property is to be sold by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (f)  All property, real or personal, whether belonging to religious or charitable or benevolent organizations, which is used for hospital purposes, and nurses' homes where a part thereof, and which maintain one or more charity wards that are for charity patients, and where all the income from said hospitals and nurses' homes is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit.  All property, real or personal, belonging to a federally qualified health center where all the income from such center is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit. (g)  The wearing apparel of every person; and also jewelry and watches kept by the owner for personal use to the extent of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in value for each owner. (h)  Provisions on hand for family consumption. (i)  All farm products grown in this state for a period of two (2) years after they are harvested, when in the possession of or the title to which is in the producer, except the tax of one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) per pound on lint cotton now levied by the Board of Commissioners of the Mississippi Levee District; and lint cotton for five (5) years, and cottonseed, soybeans, oats, rice and wheat for one (1) year regardless of ownership. (j)  All guns and pistols kept by the owner for private use. (k)  All poultry in the hands of the producer. (l)  Household furniture, including all articles kept in the home by the owner for his own personal or family use; but this shall not apply to hotels, rooming houses or rented or leased apartments. (m)  All cattle and oxen. (n)  All sheep, goats and hogs. (o)  All horses, mules and asses. (p)  Farming tools, implements and machinery, when used exclusively in the cultivation or harvesting of crops or timber. (q)  All property of agricultural and mechanical associations and fairs used for promoting their objects, and where no part of the proceeds is used for profit. (r)  The libraries of all persons. (s)  All pictures and works of art, not kept for or offered for sale as merchandise. (t)  The tools of any mechanic necessary for carrying on his trade. (u)  All state, county, municipal, levee, drainage and all school bonds or other governmental obligations, and all bonds and/or evidences of debts issued by any church or church organization in this state, and all notes and evidences of indebtedness which bear a rate of interest not greater than the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all money loaned at a rate of interest not exceeding the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all stock in or bonds of foreign corporations or associations shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes. (v)  All lands and other property situated or located between the Mississippi River and the levee shall be exempt from the payment of any and all road taxes levied or assessed under any road laws of this state. (w)  Any and all money on deposit in either national banks, state banks or trust companies, on open account, savings account or time deposit. (x)  All wagons, carts, drays, carriages and other horse-drawn vehicles, kept for the use of the owner. (y)  (i)  Boats, seines and fishing equipment used in fishing and shrimping operations and in the taking or catching of oysters. (ii)  All towboats, tugboats and barges documented under the laws of the United States, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (z)  (i)  All materials used in the construction and/or conversion of vessels in this state; (ii)  Vessels while under construction and/or conversion; (iii)  Vessels while in the possession of the manufacturer, builder or converter, for a period of twelve (12) months after completion of construction and/or conversion; however, the twelve-month limitation shall not apply to: 1.  Vessels used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals offshore outside the boundaries of this state; or 2.  Vessels that were used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals that are converted to a new service for use outside the boundaries of this state; (iv)  1.  In order for a vessel described in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) to be exempt for a period of more than twelve (12) months, the vessel must: a.  Be operating or operable, generating or capable of generating its own power or connected to some other power source, and not removed from the service or use for which manufactured or to which converted; and b.  The manufacturer, builder, converter or other entity possessing the vessel must be in compliance with any lease or other agreement with any applicable port authority or other entity regarding the vessel and in compliance with all applicable tax laws of this state and applicable federal tax laws. 2.  A vessel exempt from taxation under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) may not be exempt for a period of more than three (3) years unless the board of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, in which the vessel would otherwise be taxable adopts a resolution or ordinance authorizing the extension of the exemption and setting a maximum period for the exemption. (v)  As used in this paragraph (z), the term "vessel" includes ships, offshore drilling equipment, dry docks, boats and barges, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (aa)   * * *Sixty‑six and two‑thirds percent (66‑2/3%) of nuclear fuel and reprocessed, recycled or residual nuclear fuel by‑products, fissionable or otherwise, used or to be used in generation of electricity by persons defined as public utilities in Section 77‑3‑3. [Deleted]. (bb)  All growing nursery stock. (cc)  A semitrailer used in interstate commerce. (dd)  All property, real or personal, used exclusively for the housing of and provision of services to elderly persons, disabled persons, mentally impaired persons or as a nursing home, which is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose membership or governing body is appointed or confirmed by a religious society or ecclesiastical body or any congregation thereof. (ee)  All vessels while in the hands of bona fide dealers as merchandise and which are not being operated upon the waters of this state shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes. As used in this paragraph, the terms "vessel" and "waters of this state" shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in Section 59-21-3. (ff)  All property, real or personal, owned by a nonprofit organization that:  (i) is qualified as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (ii) assists in the implementation of the national contingency plan or area contingency plan, and which is created in response to the requirements of Title IV, Subtitle B of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Public Law 101-380; (iii) engages primarily in programs to contain, clean up and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring in the United States coastal or tidal waters; and (iv) is used for the purposes of the organization. (gg)  If a municipality changes its boundaries so as to include within the boundaries of such municipality the project site of any project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), all real and personal property located on the project site within the boundaries of such municipality that is owned by a business enterprise operating such project, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation for a period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years upon receiving approval for such exemption by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to authorize a breach of any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 21-1-59. (hh)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests (including, but not limited to, subleaseholds and subleasehold interests), of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of a facility for the manufacture, production, generation, transmission and/or distribution of electricity, and any real property related thereto, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation during the period as the United States is both the title owner of the property and a sublessee of or with respect to the property; however, the exemption authorized by this paragraph (hh) shall not apply to any entity to whom the United States sub-subleases its interest in the property nor to any entity to whom the United States assigns its sublease interest in the property.  As used in this paragraph, the term "United States" includes an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America.  This paragraph (hh) shall apply to all assessments for ad valorem taxation for the 2003 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter. (ii)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, used by Mississippi nonprofit entities qualified, on or before January 1, 2005, under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide support and operate technology incubators for research and development start-up companies, telecommunication startup companies and/or other technology startup companies, utilizing technology spun-off from research and development activities of the public colleges and universities of this state, State of Mississippi governmental research or development activities resulting therefrom located within the State of Mississippi. (jj)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, of start-up companies (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section) for the period of time, not to exceed five (5) years, that the startup company remains a tenant of a technology incubator (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section). (kk)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests, of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of an auxiliary facility, and any real property related thereto, constructed or renovated pursuant to Section 37-101-41. (ll)  Equipment brought into the state temporarily for use during a disaster response period as provided in Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9 and subsequently removed from the state on or before the end of the disaster response period as defined in Section 27-113-5. (mm)  For any lease or contractual arrangement to which the Department of Finance and Administration and a nonprofit corporation are a party to as provided in Section 39-25-1(5), the nonprofit corporation shall, along with the possessory and leasehold interests and/or real and personal property of the corporation, be exempt from all ad valorem taxation, including, but not limited to, school, city and county ad valorem taxes, for the term or period of time stated in the lease or contractual arrangement. (nn)  All property, real or personal, that is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and used to provide, free of charge, (i) a practice facility for a public school district swim team, and (ii) a facility for another not-for-profit organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to conduct water safety and lifeguard training programs.  This section shall not apply to real or personal property owned by a country club, tennis club with a pool, or any club requiring stock ownership for membership. (oo)  Any all-terrain vehicle, as defined in Section 63-21-5, when held by a retailer on a consignment or floor plan basis. SECTION 8.  Section 19-9-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-151.  The in-lieu payments made to the State Tax Commission pursuant to Section 27-35-309(3)(b), excluding payments made in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) which are required to be paid into the General Fund of the state, shall be distributed by the State Tax Commission as follows: (a)  For fiscal year 1987, fifty percent (50%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (b)  For fiscal year 1988, forty-five percent (45%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (c)  For fiscal year 1989, forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (d)  For fiscal year 1990, thirty-five (35%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (e)  For fiscal year 1991 and thereafter, thirty percent (30%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located. SECTION 9.  Section 19-9-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-153.  Of the funds received pursuant to Section 19-9-151 by a situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located, the board of supervisors of such situs county shall distribute ten percent (10%) of each payment, upon receipt, to the most populous incorporated municipality within the county; however, if such plant is located within a municipality, such payments which would otherwise be made to the situs county pursuant to Section 19-9-151 shall be divided equally between the situs county and situs municipality. SECTION 10.  Section 19-9-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-155.  Of the funds retained by the situs county after the payment made pursuant to Section 19-9-153, not more than Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) per year may be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax, and any funds in excess of such amount shall be expended in accordance with Section 19-9-157. SECTION 11.  Section 19-9-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-157.  The board of supervisors of the situs county, upon receipt of the payments pursuant to Section 19-9-151 less the payment made according to Section 19-9-153, shall pay all such funds in excess of Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) to the governing authorities of the public school districts in such county in the proportion that the net enrollment for the preceding scholastic year of each school district bears to the total net enrollment of the county for the preceding scholastic year.  Such funds may be expended only for the purposes of capital improvements to school facilities and only after plans therefor have been submitted to and approved by the State Board of Education.  The governing authorities of such school districts may borrow money in anticipation of receipt of payments pursuant to this section and the levying authority for the school district may issue negotiable notes therefor, for the purposes set forth herein.  Such loan shall be repaid from the payments received under this section by the governing authorities of the public school district.  However, no public school districts within the situs county shall be entitled to any payments after January 1, 1990. SECTION 12.  Section 27-39-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-39-305.  (1)  In addition to the levy authorized by Section 27-39-303, the board of supervisors may annually impose a countywide ad valorem tax levy or levies for the maintenance and/or construction of roads and bridges. (2)  For each fiscal year, the aggregate receipts from taxes levied for the maintenance and/or construction of roads and bridges pursuant to this section shall not exceed the aggregate receipts from this source during any one (1) of the immediately preceding three (3) fiscal years, as determined by the board of supervisors, plus an increase not to exceed ten percent (10%). The additional revenue from the ad valorem tax on any newly constructed properties or any existing properties added to the tax rolls or any properties previously exempt, which were not assessed in the next preceding year may be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation set forth herein. (3)  The ten percent (10%) increase limitation prescribed in this section may be increased an additional amount only as provided in subsection (4) of this section or when the county board of supervisors has determined the need for additional revenues and has held an election on the question of raising the limitation prescribed in this section.  The limitation may be increased under this subsection only if the proposed increase is approved by a majority of those voting in an election held for such purpose.  The resolution, notice and manner of holding the election shall be as prescribed by law for the holding of elections for the issuance of bonds by the county board of supervisors.  Revenues collected for the fiscal year in excess of the ten percent (10%) increase limitation pursuant to an election shall be included in the tax base for the purpose of determining aggregate receipts for which the ten percent (10%) increase limitation applies for subsequent fiscal years. (4)  As an alternative to the procedure provided in subsection (3) of this section, the ten percent (10%) increase limitation prescribed in this section may be increased by an additional amount without an election thereon if the aggregate receipts from the levy authorized in this section and from all other county levies to which Sections 27-39-320 and 27-39-321 apply do not exceed one hundred ten percent (110%) of the aggregate receipts from all such levies during any one (1) of the immediately preceding three (3) fiscal years, as determined by the board of supervisors. (5)  Except as otherwise provided for excess revenues generated pursuant to an election under subsection (3) of this section and for excess revenues generated in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, if revenues collected as the result of the taxes levied for the fiscal year pursuant to this section exceed the increase limitation, then it shall be the mandatory duty of the board of supervisors to deposit such excess receipts over and above the increase limitation into a special account and credit it to the county road and bridge fund.  It will be the further duty of such board to hold said funds and invest the same as authorized by law.  Such excess funds shall be calculated in the road and bridge budget for the succeeding fiscal year.  Taxes imposed for the succeeding year shall be reduced by the amount of excess funds available.  Under no circumstances shall such excess funds be expended during the fiscal year in which such excess funds are collected. (6)  In any county where there is located a nuclear generating power plant on which a tax is assessed under Section 27-35-309(3), the term "the aggregate receipts from taxes" as used in this section shall be the portion of the "base revenue" as defined in Section 27-39-320 which is used for the maintenance and/or construction of roads and bridges. (7)  If a shortfall occurs in revenues from sources other than ad valorem taxes and oil and gas severance taxes budgeted for the county road and bridge fund during the 1987 fiscal year, then the county may levy a special ad valorem tax for the 1988 fiscal year in an amount the avails of which shall not exceed such shortfall; provided, however, that the aggregate receipts from all ad valorem levies for the maintenance and/or construction of roads and bridges for the 1988 fiscal year shall not exceed the aggregate receipts from this source for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus an increase not to exceed twenty percent (20%). (8)  If a shortfall occurs in revenues from oil and gas severance taxes budgeted for the county road and bridge fund during the 1987 fiscal year, then the county may levy a special ad valorem tax for the 1988 fiscal year in an amount the avails of which shall not exceed such shortfall.  The avails of such special ad valorem tax shall not be included within the ten percent (10%) increase limitation.  The ad valorem taxes levied to offset the shortfall shall be deemed to be ad valorem tax receipts produced in the 1988 fiscal year for the purpose of determining the limitation on receipts for the succeeding fiscal years. SECTION 13.  Section 27-39-320, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-39-320.  (1)  The Legislature finds and determines that legislation requiring a specific levy or requiring consent of some other governing body to reduce the levy was intended to raise a certain amount of revenue for specific purposes.  Upon this determination and notwithstanding the provisions of any statute which requires a definite levy to be made or which requires that a levy may not be reduced except by the consent of some other governing authority, the amount of such levy shall be deemed to be an amount necessary to produce the revenues received in the next preceding year plus, at the option of the taxing authority, an increase not to exceed ten percent (10%) of such revenues. (2)  In any county where there is located a nuclear generating power plant on which a tax is assessed under Section 27-35-309(3), such required levy and revenue produced thereby may be reduced by the levying authority in an amount in proportion to a reduction in the base revenue of any such county from the previous year.  Such reduction shall be allowed only if the reduction in base revenue equals or exceeds five percent (5%). "Base revenue" shall mean the revenue received by the county from the ad valorem tax levy plus the revenue received by the county from the tax assessed under Section 27-35-309(3) and authorized to be used for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax.  For purposes of determining if the reduction equals or exceeds five percent (5%), a levy of millage equal to the prior year's millage shall be hypothetically applied to the current year's ad valorem tax base to determine the amount of revenue to be generated from the ad valorem tax levy.  For the purposes of this section, the portion of base revenue used to fund the purpose for which a specific levy is required shall be deemed to be the total receipts from ad valorem taxes for such purpose. This paragraph shall apply to taxes levied for the 1987 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.  If the Mississippi Supreme Court or another court finally adjudicates that the tax levied under Section 27-35-309(3) is unconstitutional, then this paragraph shall stand repealed. (3)  With respect to ad valorem taxes levied on or after October 1, 1980, no county or municipality shall levy those mills heretofore required by law to be levied to an extent that such levy shall produce more than the total receipts produced from such levy in the next preceding year, plus, at the option of the taxing authority, an increase not to exceed ten percent (10%) of such receipts.  Such total receipts shall be deemed to include the total avails of such levy either collected from the property owner or by reimbursement by the state.  The revenues produced from any newly constructed properties or any existing properties added to the tax rolls or any properties previously exempt which were not assessed in the next preceding year may be excluded from the limitation set forth herein. (4)  The ten percent (10%) increase limitation prescribed in this section may be increased by an additional amount by the board of supervisors of any county if the aggregate receipts from all county levies to which this section and Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321 apply do not exceed one hundred ten percent (110%) of the aggregate receipts from all such levies during any one (1) of the immediately preceding three (3) fiscal years, as determined by the board of supervisors. (5)  The limitations set forth in this section shall apply to the mandatory tax levied by Section 27-39-329. SECTION 14.  Section 33-15-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 33-15-51.  The Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency. Monies paid into the fund shall be derived from Sections 27-35-309(3)(b)(i) and (ii) and 27-35-309(3)(d).  All monies deposited therein shall be available for expenditure, transfer and allocation by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for state and local preparedness activities directly related to the Grand Gulf Nuclear Generating Plant, with at least fifty percent (50%) of the monies in the fund earmarked for use in conducting such activities in the geographic area falling within a thirty-mile radius of the plant. SECTION 15.  Section 37-57-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-57-105.  (1)  In addition to the taxes levied under Section 37-57-1, the levying authority for the school district, as defined in Section 37-57-1, upon receipt of a certified copy of an order adopted by the school board of the school district requesting an ad valorem tax effort in dollars for the support of the school district and any charter schools located in the district, shall, at the same time and in the same manner as other ad valorem taxes are levied, levy an annual ad valorem tax in the amount fixed in such order upon all of the taxable property of such school district, which shall not be less than the millage rate certified by the State Board of Education as the uniform minimum school district ad valorem tax levy required for the support of the total funding formula as required by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 in such school district under Sections 37-57-1 and 37-151-211.  However, any school district levying less than the uniform minimum school district ad valorem tax levy on July 1, 1997, shall only be required to increase its local district maintenance levy in four (4) mill annual increments in order to attain such millage requirements.  In making such levy, the levying authority shall levy an additional amount sufficient to cover anticipated delinquencies and costs of collection so that the net amount of money to be produced by such levy shall be equal to the amount which is requested by the school board.  The proceeds of such tax levy, excluding levies for the payment of the principal of and interest on school bonds or notes and excluding levies for costs of collection, shall be placed in the school depository to the credit of the school district and shall be expended in the manner provided by law for the purpose of supplementing teachers' salaries, extending school terms, purchasing furniture, supplies and materials, and for all other lawful operating and incidental expenses of such school district. The monies authorized to be received by school districts from the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund pursuant to Section 37-61-35 shall be included as ad valorem tax receipts.  The levying authority for the school district, as defined in Section 37-57-1, shall reduce the ad valorem tax levy for such school district in an amount equal to the amount distributed to such school district from the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund each calendar year pursuant to Section 37-61-35.  Such reduction shall not be less than the millage rate necessary to generate a reduction in ad valorem tax receipts equal to the funds distributed to such school district from the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund pursuant to Section 37-61-35. The millage levy certified by the State Board of Education as the minimum tax levy shall be subject to the provisions of this paragraph. In any county where there is located a nuclear generating power plant on which a tax is assessed under Section 27-35-309(3), such required levy and revenue produced thereby may be reduced by the levying authority in an amount in proportion to a reduction in the base revenue of any such county from the previous year.  Such reduction shall be allowed only if the reduction in base revenue equals or exceeds five percent (5%).  "Base revenue" shall mean the revenue received by the county from the ad valorem tax levy plus the revenue received by the county from the tax assessed under Section 27-35-309(3) and authorized to be used for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax.  For purposes of determining if the reduction equals or exceeds five percent (5%), a levy of millage equal to the prior year's millage shall be hypothetically applied to the current year's ad valorem tax base to determine the amount of revenue to be generated from the ad valorem tax levy.  For the purposes of this section and Section 37-57-107, the portion of the base revenue used for the support of any school district shall be deemed to be the aggregate receipts from ad valorem taxes for the support of any school district.  This paragraph shall apply to taxes levied for the 1987 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.  If the Mississippi Supreme Court or another court finally adjudicates that the tax levied under Section 27-35-309(3) is unconstitutional, then this paragraph shall stand repealed. The State Department of Education shall calculate a local pro rata amount for the aggregate receipts of the tax levied in this section by dividing the aggregate receipts by the sum of the school district's net enrollment, as determined under Section 37-151-211, and the net enrollment of any charter school students who reside in the district. (2)  When the tax is levied upon the territory of any school district located in two (2) or more counties, the order of the school board requesting the levying of such tax shall be certified to the levying authority of each of the counties involved, and each of the levying authorities shall levy the tax in the manner specified herein. The taxes so levied shall be collected by the tax collector of the levying authority involved and remitted by the tax collector to the school depository of the home county to the credit of the school district involved as provided above, except that taxes for collection fees may be retained by the levying authority for deposit into its general fund. (3)  The aggregate receipts from ad valorem taxes levied for school district purposes, excluding collection fees, pursuant to this section and Section 37-57-1 shall be subject to the increased limitation under Section 37-57-107; however, if the ad valorem tax effort in dollars requested by the school district for the fiscal year exceeds the next preceding fiscal year's ad valorem tax effort in dollars by more than four percent (4%) but not more than seven percent (7%), then the school board shall publish notice thereof once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the school district involved, with the first publication thereof to be made not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the final adoption of the budget by the school board.  If at any time prior to the adoption a petition signed by not less than twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the school district involved shall be filed with the school board requesting that an election be called on the question of exceeding the next preceding fiscal year's ad valorem tax effort in dollars by more than four percent (4%) but not more than seven percent (7%), then the school board shall, not later than the next regular meeting, adopt a resolution calling an election to be held within such school district upon such question.  The election shall be called and held, and notice thereof shall be given, in the same manner for elections upon the questions of the issuance of the bonds of school districts, and the results thereof shall be certified to the school board.  The ballot shall contain the language "For the School Tax Increase Over Four Percent (4%)" and "Against the School Tax Increase Over Four Percent (4%)."  If a majority of the qualified electors of the school district who voted in such election shall vote in favor of the question, then the stated increase requested by the school board shall be approved.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the revenue sources excluded from the increased limitation under Section 37-57-107 shall also be excluded from the limitation described herein in the same manner as they are excluded under Section 37-57-107. SECTION 16.  Section 37-151-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-87.  No school district shall pay any teacher less than the state minimum salary.  However, school districts are authorized to reduce the state minimum salary by a pro rata daily amount in order to comply with the school district employee furlough provisions of Section 37-7-308.  From and after July 1, 2012, no school district shall receive any funds under the provisions of this chapter for any school year during which the aggregate amount of local supplement is reduced below such amount for the previous year.  However, (a) where there has been a reduction in total funding formula allocations for such district in such year, (b) where there has been a reduction in the amount of federal funds to such district below the previous year, or (c) where there has been a reduction in ad valorem taxes to such school district for the 1986-1987 school year below the amount for the previous year due to the exemption of nuclear generating plants from ad valorem taxation pursuant to Section 27-35-309, the aggregate amount of local supplement in such district may be reduced in the discretion of the local school board without loss of funds under this chapter.  No school district may receive any funds under the provisions of this chapter for any school year if the aggregate amount of support from ad valorem taxation shall be reduced during such school year below such amount for the previous year; however, where there is a loss in total funding formula allocations, or where there is or heretofore has been a decrease in the total assessed value of taxable property within a school district, the aggregate amount of such support may be reduced proportionately.  Nothing herein contained shall prohibit any school district from adopting or continuing a program or plan whereby teachers are paid varying salaries according to the teaching ability, classroom performance and other similar standards. For purposes of this section, the term "local supplement" means the additional amount paid to an individual teacher over and above the salary schedule prescribed in Section 37-19-7 for the performance of regular teaching duties by that teacher. SECTION 17.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.